New York, session 2025-2026, S2340.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The sum of five million five hundred and fifty thousand 2 dollars ($5,550,000) is hereby appropriated to the state education 3 department out of any moneys in the state treasury in the general fund 4 to the credit of the local assistance account, not otherwise appropri- 5 ated, and made immediately available, for the purpose of establishing 6 and expanding training programs for direct support professionals at 7 boards of cooperative educational services. Such moneys shall be payable 8 on the audit and warrant of the comptroller on vouchers certified or 9 approved by the commissioner of the state education department in the 10 manner prescribed by law. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04332-01-5